Utah statutes.
53A-11-101.   Definitions.
For purposes of this part:
(1) (a)  "Absence" or "absent" means, consistent with Subsection (1)(b),
failure of a school-age minor assigned to a class or class period to attend
the entire class or class period.
(b)  A school-age minor may not be considered absent under this part more than
one time during one day.
(2)  "Habitual truant" means a school-age minor who:
(a)  is at least 12 years old;
(b)  is subject to the requirements of Section 53A-11-101.5; and
(c) (i)  is truant at least ten times during one school year; or
(ii)  fails to cooperate with efforts on the part of school authorities to
resolve the minor's attendance problem as required under Section 53A-11-103.
(3)  "Minor" means a person under the age of 18 years.
(4)  "Parent" includes:
(a)  a custodial parent of the minor;
(b)  a legally appointed guardian of a minor; or
(c)  any other person purporting to exercise any authority over the minor
which could be exercised by a person described in Subsection (4)(a) or (b).
(5)  "School-age minor" means a minor who:
(a)  is at least six years old, but younger than 18 years old; and
(b)  is not emancipated.
(6)  "School year" means the period of time designated by a local school board
or local charter board as the school year for the school where the school-age
minor:
(a)  is enrolled; or
(b)  should be enrolled, if the school-age minor is not enrolled in school.
(7)  "Truant" means absent without a valid excuse.
(8)  "Truant minor" means a school-age minor who:
(a)  is subject to the requirements of Section 53A-11-101.5 or 53A-11-101.7;
and
(b)  is truant.
(9)  "Valid excuse" means:
(a)  an illness;
(b)  a family death;
(c)  an approved school activity;
(d)  an absence permitted by a school-age minor's:
(i)  individualized education program, developed pursuant to the Individuals
with Disabilities Education Improvement Act of 2004, as amended; or
(ii)  accommodation plan, developed pursuant to Section 504 of the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended; or
(e)  any other excuse established as valid by a local school board, local
charter board, or school district.
